Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.460

Payment of bonds—Call—Notice.

The city treasurer shall pay the interest on the bonds authorized to be issued by this chapter out of the respective local improvement funds from which they are payable. Whenever there shall be sufficient money in any local improvement fund against which bonds have been issued under the provisions of this chapter, over and above sufficient for the payment of interest on all unpaid bonds, to pay the principal of one or more bonds, the treasurer shall call in and pay such bonds. The bonds shall be called in and paid in their numerical order, commencing with number one. The call shall be made by publication in the city official newspaper in its first publication following the delinquency of the installment of the assessment or as soon thereafter as is practicable, and shall state that bonds No. . . . . . (giving the serial numbers of the bonds called) will be paid on the day the next interest payments on the bonds shall become due, and interest on the bonds shall cease upon such date.

[ 1985 c 469 s 5; 1983 c 167 s 15; 1915 c 154 s 18; RRS s 9270.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.